District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as the "Modification Nos. 1, 2, and 3 to Contract NFPHC-
OPS-23-C-00059 between the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation and Morrison
Management Specialists, Inc. Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of
2025".
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code§ 1-204.51), and
notwithstanding the requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform
Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code§ 2-352.02),
the Council approves Modification Nos. 1, 2, and 3 to Contract No. NFPHC-OPS-23-C-
00059 between the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation and Morrison Management

(b) The Base Year agreement was approved by Council in the amount of
$1,527,560.00 for the period of August 1, 2023 through July 31, 2024 (A25-472).
(c) Modification #1 represented a partial year execution of Option Year 1, from
August 1, 2024 to March 31, 2025, for $997,649.00.
(d) When it was announced that Cedar Hill’s opening would be delayed by fifteen
days, the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation prepared Modification 2 for $53,618.00,
which sought to extend the contract from April 1, 2025 to April 15, 2025. This extension
necessitated Council approval, because when combined with the previous Modification 1,
the total retroactive value for the Option Year 1 would be $1,051,267.00.
(e) Unfortunately, Morrison was not able to obtain its Certificate of Clean Hands
until July 8, 2025, which made it impossible for United Medical Center to submit the
Contract modifications to DC Council until after its summer recess.
(d) As United Medical Center continued to prepare for its September 30, 2025
dissolution and for Council to resume business, it was determined that the Contract
trended over budget due to the impact of inflation on the cost of food and higher than
estimated utilization. These higher costs totaled $93,466.00 and are captured in Proposed
Modification 3.
(e) If Proposed Modifications 2 and 3, totaling $147,084.00, are approved, the
revised total retroactive value of Option Year 1 would have an aggregate value of
$1,144,733.00; therefore, Council approval is necessary.
(f) Without this approval, Morrison Management Specialists, Inc., cannot be paid
for these critical food services provided to United Medical Center in excess of
$999,999.99.


Sec. 3. The Council determines that the circumstances enumerated in section 2
constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that Modification Nos. 1, 2, and
3 to Contract NFPHC-OPS-23-C-00059 between the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation
and Morrison Management Specialists, Inc. Approval and Payment Authorization
Emergency Act of 2025, be adopted after a single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.